Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1129.
do enact as follows:SB1129,13Section 1. 100.20 (1p) of the statutes is created to read:SB1129,2,21100.20 (1p) It is an unfair trade practice for a person to sell or offer to sell food 2or beverages in violation of s. 100.306.SB1129,23Section 2. 100.306 of the statutes is created to read:SB1129,2,54100.306 Unfair sales practices at publicly funded stadiums. (1) 5Definitions. In this section:SB1129,2,76(a) “Concessionaire” means a person authorized by the owner or operator of a 7stadium to sell food or beverages at designated locations within the stadium.SB1129,2,118(b) “Public financial support” means any form of direct or indirect financial 9assistance from the state or a local governmental unit, as defined in s. 16.97 (7), 10including payments; grants; loans; tax reductions, incentives, or benefits; or 11proceeds from tax-exempt bonds.SB1129,2,1312(c) 1. Except as provided in subd. 2., “stadium” means a multipurpose facility 13that meets all of the following criteria:SB1129,2,1414a. The facility is located in this state.SB1129,2,1615b. The facility is designed and principally used for sporting or entertainment 16events or both. SB1129,2,1717c. The facility has a capacity of at least 3,000 persons. SB1129,2,1918d. The owner of the facility receives public financial support related to the 19facility.SB1129,2,21202. “Stadium” does not include a facility owned or leased by any of the 21following:SB1129,2,2222a. A school board, as defined in s. 115.001 (7).SB1129,2,2323b. The governing body of a private school, as defined in s. 115.001 (3d).SB1129,2,2424c. The operator of a charter school, as defined in s. 115.001 (1).SB1129,3,11d. The governing body of a tribal school, as defined in s. 115.001 (15m).SB1129,3,52(2) Prohibition. A stadium owner, operator, or concessionaire may not sell or 3offer for sale within the stadium food or beverages at a price that exceeds the cost to 4retailer, as calculated under s. 100.30 (2) (am) 2. and (b), for the food and beverages, 5plus a markup of no more than 20 percent.SB1129,3,66